Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.810

Application of chapter not limited.

Nothing in RCW 21.20.700, 21.20.702, or 21.20.855 limits the application of other provisions of this chapter.

[ 2020 c 151 s 1; 1988 c 244 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—Implementation—Application—1988 c 244: See notes following RCW 21.20.700.